Hawaii statutes.
§226-14 Objective and policies for facility
systems--in general. (a) Planning for the State's facility systems in
general shall be directed towards achievement of the objective of water,
transportation, waste disposal, and energy and telecommunication systems that
support statewide social, economic, and physical objectives.

(b) To achieve the general facility systems
objective, it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Accommodate the needs of Hawaii's people through
coordination of facility systems and capital improvement priorities in
consonance with state and county plans.

(2) Encourage flexibility in the design and
development of facility systems to promote prudent use of resources and
accommodate changing public demands and priorities.

(3) Ensure that required facility systems can be
supported within resource capacities and at reasonable cost to the user.

(4) Pursue alternative methods of financing programs
and projects and cost-saving techniques in the planning, construction, and
maintenance of facility systems. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 276,
§13]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next